Utah statutes.
19-4-107.   Notice of violation of rule or order -- Action by attorney general.

(1)  Upon discovery of any violation of a rule or order of the board, the board or the director shall promptly notify the supplier of the violation, state the nature of the violation, and issue an order requiring correction of that violation or the filing of a request for variance or exemption by a specific date.

(2)  The attorney general shall, upon request of the director, commence an action for an injunction or other relief relative to the order.



Amended by Chapter 360, 2012 General Session

